Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.160

Emergencies subject to hearing—Petition for review suspends order.

The service and filing of the petition shall operate to suspend the emergency order and the authority to make any expenditure or incur any liability thereunder until final determination of the matter by the court.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.40.160. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 143 s 2, part; 1923 c 164 s 6, part; RRS s 3997-6, part.]